apertium-lvs.lvs.dix
    <pardef n="/sle__n">
      <e><p><l>sle</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sles</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sles</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>slei</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sli</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sli</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>slē</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sle</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sles</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>šļu</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>slēm</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>slēm</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sles</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>slēm</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>slēs</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sles</l><r>sle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/lne__n">
      <e><p><l>lne</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnes</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnes</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnei</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lni</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lni</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnē</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lne</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnes</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>		        </p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļņu</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnēm</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnēm</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnes</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnēm</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnēs</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lnes</l><r>lne<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e/lle__n">
      <e><p><l>lle</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lles</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lles</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>llei</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lli</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lli</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>llē</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lle</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lles</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>		        </p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļļu</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>llēm</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>llēm</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lles</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>llēm</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>llēs</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lles</l><r>lle<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nak/ts__n">
      <e><p><l>ts</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ts</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ts</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tij</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tī</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ts</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>šu</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tīm</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tīm</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tīm</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tīs</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l><r>ts<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ļau/dis__n">
      <e><p><l>dis</l><r>dis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žu</l><r>dis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dīm</l><r>dis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dīm</l><r>dis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dis</l><r>dis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dīm</l><r>dis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dīs</l><r>dis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dis</l><r>dis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mē/le__n_f">
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lei</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lē</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ļu</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lēm</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lēs</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lēm</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lēm</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>les</l><r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="elle"><i>e</i><par n="e/lle__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lelle"><i>le</i><par n="e/lle__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nakts"><i>nak</i><par n="nak/ts__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ļaudis"><i>ļau</i><par n="ļau/dis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akmeņogle"><i>akmeņog</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="caurule"><i>cauru</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="datorspēle"><i>datorspē</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izvēle"><i>izvē</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="katedrāle"><i>katedrā</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrole"><i>kontro</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="locekle"><i>locek</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mēle"><i>mē</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="morāle"><i>morā</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nulle"><i>nu</i><par n="e/lle__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasaule"><i>pasau</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pavēle"><i>pavē</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pele"><i>pe</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pludmale"><i>pludma</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="saule"><i>sau</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="spēle"><i>spē</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vēstule"><i>vēstu</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zāle"><i>zā</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
